Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 17-113, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 17-113. A. In determining annual increments for
teacher salaries and in computing Foundation Aid, time spent in
military service during a period of national emergency shall be
counted, not to exceed five (5) years prior to the current year. No
more than five (5) years of such military service shall be used in
determining eligibility or benefits under the Teachers' Retirement
System.
B. For purposes of this section, the term "military service"
shall include the United States Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 1

Corp s, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of these
services, as well as the federal and state counterparts of both the
Air National Guard and Army National Guard.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.
2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 school
year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of Title 70
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, in the public schools of
Oklahoma shall receive in salary and/or fringe benefits not less
than the amounts specified in the following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Years of Bachelor's Board Master's Doctor's
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 2

9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
Master's Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 3

4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
18 $54,691
19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
25 $59,153
B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule, "fringe
benefits" shall mean all or part of retirement benefits, excluding
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 4

the contributions made pursuant to subsection A of Section 17-108.1
of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title and the flexible
benefit allowance pursuant to Section 26-105 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title from the flexible benefit allowance
funds disbursed by the State Board of Education and the State Board
of Career and Technology Education pursuant to Section 26-104 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher's salary would be less than the
amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
retirement benefits such that the teacher's salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education or appropriate
state accrediting agency for the districts. The Board shall accept
teaching experience from out-of-country schools that are accredited
or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate national or regional
accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-country certification
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 5

docu mentation in a language other than English shall be analyzed by
an educational credential evaluation service in accordance with
industry standards and guidelines and approved by the State
Department of Education. The person seeking to have credit granted
for out-of-country teaching experience shall be responsible for all
costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation service. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from primary and secondary schools
that are operated by the United States Department of Defense or are
affiliated with the United States Department of State.
D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,
no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of
active duty in the military service, as defined in Section 17-113 of
this title, or out-of-state or out-of-country teaching experience as
a certified teacher or its equivalent. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit boards of education from crediting more years of
experience on district salary schedules than those allowed for state
purposes.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 6

by t he State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in Oklahoma;
4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher
was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma
if the experience primarily involved work with persons of school- or
preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the experience was
acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification as, a school
psychologist or psychometrist.
F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in Oklahoma and are still receiving a monthly retirement benefit.
G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in
Section 26-103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, by a
school district during the 2022-2023 school year was receiving a
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 7

sala ry above the step level indicated by the State Minimum Salary
Schedule for the 2022-2023 school year, the person shall receive a
salary increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A
of this section for the step level indicated for the person,
provided they remain employed by the same district, unless the hours
or the duties of the certified personnel are reduced
proportionately.
H. If a school district does not receive Foundation or Salary
Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title, funds shall be allocated by the State
Board of Education to implement the salary increases indicated in
subsection A of this section.
I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person, provided they remain
employed by the same technology center school district, unless the
hours or the duties of the classroom instructional employees are
reduced proportionately.
J. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 8

incr ease amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided
they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections or Office
of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the duties of the
correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or teachers are
reduced proportionately.
K. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the
State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless the hours or the
duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 9

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1465 Page 10